Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.203

Certain records exempt from public disclosure—Exceptions—Actions not prohibited by chapter.

(1) Pursuant to RCW 42.56.380, certain agricultural business records, commodity board records, and department of agriculture records relating to commodity boards and producers of agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to either the department or a commodity board for the purpose of administering this chapter or a marketing order or agreement may be shared between the department and the applicable commodity board. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or administrative hearing involving this chapter or a marketing order or agreement.

(3) This chapter does not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a number of persons subject to any marketing order or agreement as long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person; or

(b) The publication by the director or a commodity board of the name of any person violating any marketing order or agreement and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

[ 2005 c 274 s 216; 2002 c 313 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.